Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1229
Developmental Disabilities Provider Capital and Equipment Maintenance Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Developmental Disabilities Provider Capital and Equipment Maintenance Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, bequests, money received from any public or private source, money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, and money transferred to the fund by the Legislature.

(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(3)(a) The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.

(b) The Department of Health and Human Services may award grants from the fund pursuant to section 83-1230.

(c) The fund shall not be used for the general operation or administration of the state's developmental disabilities program.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 82.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.